Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 3
DETENTION

19-2.5-301. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly declares that the placement of children and juveniles in a detention facility exacts a negative impact on the mental and physical well-being of the child or juvenile, and such detention may make it more likely that the child or juvenile
will reoffend. Children and juveniles who are detained are more likely to penetrate deeper into the juvenile justice system than similar children or juveniles who are not detained, and community-based alternatives to detention should
be based on the principle of using the least-restrictive setting possible and returning a child or juvenile to his or her home, family, or other responsible adult whenever possible consistent with public safety. It is the intent of
the general assembly in adopting section 19-2.5-304 and amending sections 19-2.5-303, 19-2.5-305, and 19-2.5-1404 to limit the use of detention to only those children and juveniles who pose a substantial risk of serious harm to others
or that are a flight risk from prosecution.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 573, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-211.5 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-302. Local juvenile services planning committee - creation - duties - identification and notification of dually identified crossover youth.

If all of the boards of commissioners of each county or the city council of each city and county in a judicial district agree, there may be created in the judicial district a local juvenile services planning committee that is appointed by the chief judge
of the judicial district or, for the second judicial district, the presiding judge of the Denver juvenile court, from persons recommended by the boards of commissioners of each county or the city council of each city and county
within the judicial district. The committee, if practicable, must include, but need not be limited to, a representative from a county department of human or social services, a local school district, a local law enforcement agency,
a local probation department, the division of youth services, private citizens, the district attorney's office, the public defender's office, a community mental health representative, and a representative of the concerns of municipalities.
The committee, if created, shall meet as necessary to develop a plan for the allocation of resources for local juvenile services within the judicial district for the fiscal year. The committee is strongly encouraged to consider
programs with restorative justice components when developing the plan. The state department of human services shall approve the plan. A local juvenile services planning committee may be consolidated with other local advisory boards
pursuant to section 24-1.7-103.

The plan must provide for the management of dually identified crossover youth. The plan must contain descriptions and processes to include:

A process for the identification of dually identified crossover youth at the earliest reasonable point of contact;

A method for collaborating and exchanging information with other judicial districts, including with the collaborative management program described in section 24-1.9-102 and consistent with the data-sharing policies of the collaborative management program;

A process for promptly communicating information about the youth's crossover status between the child welfare and juvenile justice systems and to notify each other of the new involvement in the respective system or information that may aid in the identification
of dually identified crossover youth. The following parties should be notified of a youth's status as a dually identified crossover youth if applicable: Public defenders, district attorneys, local juvenile services planning
committee coordinators, human or social services department representatives, probation representatives, juvenile court representatives, parents, and guardians ad litem.

A process for identifying the appropriate services or placement-based assessment for a dually identified crossover youth;

A process for sharing and gathering information in accordance with applicable laws, rules, and county policy;

A process for the development of a single case management plan and identification of the lead agency for case management purposes and the engagement of dually identified crossover youth and their caregivers;

A process that facilitates the sharing of assessments and case planning information and includes policies around sharing information with other judicial districts;

A process for a multidisciplinary group of professionals to consider decisions that include youth and community safety, placement, provision of needed services, alternatives to detention and commitment, probation, parole, permanency, education stability,
and case closure; and

A requirement that dually identified crossover youth placed in a secure detention facility who are deemed eligible for release by the court be placed in the least restrictive setting whenever possible to reduce the disparity between dually identified
crossover youth and nondually identified crossover youth in secure detention.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 574, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-211 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-303. Duty of officer - screening teams - notification - release or detention.

When a juvenile is taken into temporary custody and not released pending charges, the officer shall notify the screening team for the judicial district in which the juvenile is taken into custody. The screening team shall notify the juvenile's parent,
guardian, or legal custodian without unnecessary delay and inform the juvenile's parent, guardian, or legal custodian that, if the juvenile is placed in detention or a temporary holding facility, all parties have a right to a prompt
hearing to determine whether the juvenile is to be detained further. Such notification may be made to a person with whom the juvenile is residing if a parent, guardian, or legal custodian cannot be located. If the screening team
is unable to make such notification, the notification may be made by any law enforcement officer, juvenile probation officer, detention center counselor, or detention facility staff in whose physical custody the juvenile is placed.

If the law enforcement officer does not release the juvenile to the care of the juvenile's parents, legal guardian, kin, or other responsible adult, the screening team shall administer a validated detention screening instrument developed or adopted pursuant
to section 19-2.5-1404. The law enforcement officer, screening team, or juvenile court shall not remove the juvenile from the custody of the parent or legal guardian pursuant to this section unless the screening team or
the juvenile court:

First finds that a validated detention screening instrument selected or adopted pursuant to section 19-2.5-1404 has been administered and the juvenile scored as detention-eligible; or

There are grounds to override the results of the detention screening instrument based on the criteria developed in accordance with section 19-2.5-1404; and

Finds that the juvenile poses a substantial risk of serious harm to others or a substantial risk of flight from prosecution and finds that community-based alternatives to detention are insufficient to reasonably mitigate that risk. Flight from prosecution
is distinguished from simple failure to appear and must generally be evidenced by a demonstrated record of repeat, recent willful failures to appear at a scheduled court appearance.

The screening team shall administer the detention screening instrument for each juvenile under consideration for detention. The detention screening instrument must be administered by a screener who has completed training to administer the detention screening
instrument.

Any information concerning a juvenile that is obtained during the administration of the detention screening instrument must be used solely for the purpose of making a recommendation to the court regarding the continued detention of the juvenile. The information
is not subject to subpoena or other court process, for use in any other proceeding, or for any other purpose.

Court records and division of youth services records must include data on detention screening scores and, if the score does not mandate detention, the explanation for the override placing the juvenile in detention.

A juvenile who must be taken from the juvenile's home but who does not require physical restriction must be given temporary care with a grandparent, kin, or other suitable person; in a temporary shelter facility designated by the court; or with the county
department of human or social services and must not be placed in detention.

The screening team and the juvenile court shall use the results from the detention screening instrument in making a release determination. Release options include allowing a juvenile to return home with no supervision, or with limited supervision such
as a location monitoring device, or a referral to a preadjudication alternative to detention or service program established pursuant to section 19-2.5-606.

The juvenile must be released to the care of the juvenile's parents, kin, or other responsible adult, unless a determination has been made in accordance with subsection (2) of this section that the juvenile's substantial risk of serious harm to others
requires that the juvenile be detained. The court may make reasonable orders as conditions of release pursuant to section 19-2.5-305 (5). In addition, the court may provide that any violation of such orders may subject
the juvenile to contempt sanctions of the court. The parent, kin, or other person to whom the juvenile is released is required to sign a written promise, on forms supplied by the court, to bring the juvenile to the court
at a time set or to be set by the court. Failure, without good cause, to comply with the promise subjects the juvenile's parent or any other person to whom the juvenile is released to contempt sanctions of the court.

Parents or legal guardians of a juvenile released from detention pursuant to this section shall complete the relative information form described in section 19-2.5-1404 (1)(b)(VIII) no later than the next hearing on the matter.

Except as required in subsection (4)(b) of this section, a law enforcement officer shall not detain a juvenile any longer than is reasonably necessary to obtain basic identification information and to contact the juvenile's parents, guardian, or legal
custodian.

If the juvenile is not released as required in subsection (3) of this section, the juvenile must be taken directly to the court or to the place of detention, a temporary holding facility, a temporary shelter designated by the court, or a preadjudication
service program established pursuant to section 19-2.5-606 without unnecessary delay.

As an alternative to taking a juvenile into temporary custody pursuant to subsections (1), (3), and (4) of this section, a law enforcement officer may, if authorized by the establishment of a policy that permits such service by order of the chief judge
of the judicial district or the presiding judge of the Denver juvenile court, which policy is established after consultation between such judge and the district attorney and law enforcement officials in the judicial district,
serve a written promise to appear for juvenile proceedings based on any act that would constitute a felony, misdemeanor, or petty offense upon the juvenile and the juvenile's parent, guardian, or legal custodian.

A promise to appear served pursuant to subsection (5)(a) of this section must state any charges against the juvenile and the date, time, and place where the juvenile is required to answer such charges. The promise to appear must also state:

That the juvenile has the right to have the assistance of counsel;

That counsel can be appointed for the juvenile if the juvenile and the juvenile's parent, guardian, or legal custodian lack adequate resources to retain counsel or the juvenile's parent, guardian, or legal custodian refuses to retain counsel for the juvenile;

That, to determine if the juvenile is eligible for court-appointed counsel, or to apply for court-appointed counsel, the juvenile's parent, guardian, or legal custodian is advised to call the office of the state public defender, visit the state public
defender's office, or visit the state public defender's internet website;

That, to avoid delay in obtaining counsel, the juvenile's parent, guardian, or legal custodian is advised to apply for court-appointed counsel at least five days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, before the juvenile's promised date of
appearance; and

The contact information for the local office of the state public defender, including the office's telephone number and address, and the address of the internet website of the office of the state public defender.

Repealed.

The juvenile shall sign the promise to appear. The promise to appear must be served upon the juvenile's parent, guardian, or legal custodian by personal service or by certified mail, return receipt requested. The date established for the juvenile and
the juvenile's parent, guardian, or legal custodian to appear must not be earlier than seven days nor later than thirty-five days after the promise to appear is served upon both the juvenile and the juvenile's parent, guardian,
or legal custodian.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 575, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2022:
(5)(c) repealed, (SB 22-018), ch. 191, p. 1274, § 6, effective July 15.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-507 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-304. Limitations on detention.

Detention is not permitted for the following:

Juveniles who have not committed, or have not been accused of committing, a delinquent act unless otherwise found in contempt of court;

Delinquent and nondelinquent juveniles who have been placed in the legal custody of a county department of human or social services pursuant to a petition in dependency or neglect and are solely awaiting out-of-home placement;

Juveniles who at admission require medical care, are intoxicated, or are under the influence of drugs, to an extent that custody of the juvenile is beyond the scope of the detention facility's medical service capacity;

Juveniles who are solely assessed as suicidal or exhibit behavior placing them at imminent risk of suicide; and

Juveniles who have not committed a delinquent act but present an imminent danger to self or others or appear to be gravely disabled as a result of a mental health disorder or an intellectual and developmental disability.

A juvenile court shall not order a juvenile who is ten years of age and older but less than thirteen years of age to detention unless the juvenile has been arrested for a felony or weapons charge pursuant to section 18-12-102, 18-12-105, 18-12-106, or
18-12-108.5. A preadjudication service program created pursuant to section 19-2.5-606 shall evaluate a juvenile described in this subsection (2). The evaluation may result in the juvenile:

Remaining in the custody of a parent or legal guardian;

Being placed in the temporary legal custody of kin, for purposes of a kinship foster care home or noncertified kinship care placement, as defined in section 19-1-103, or other suitable person under such conditions as the court may impose;

Being placed in a temporary shelter facility; or

Being referred to a local county department of human or social services for assessment for placement.

A juvenile shall not be placed in detention solely:

Due to lack of supervision alternatives, service options, or more appropriate facilities;

Due to the community's inability to provide treatment or services;

Due to a lack of supervision in the home or community;

In order to allow a parent, guardian, or legal custodian to avoid legal responsibility;

Due to a risk of the juvenile's self-harm;

In order to attempt to punish, treat, or rehabilitate the juvenile;

Due to a request by a victim, law enforcement, or the community;

In order to permit more convenient administrative access to the juvenile;

In order to facilitate further interrogation or investigation; or

As a response to technical violations of probation unless the results of a detention screening instrument indicate that the juvenile poses a substantial risk of serious harm to others or if the applicable graduated responses system adopted pursuant to
section 19-2.5-1108 allows for such a placement.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 578, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-507.5 as it existed prior to 2021.